Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3623
Dissolution of Interstate Medical Licensure Compact; effect.

(a) The Interstate Medical Licensure Compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership in the compact to one member state.

(b) Upon the dissolution of the compact, the compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the interstate commission shall be concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 23.